Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 4
SHARES AND DISTRIBUTIONS

11-103-401. Subscription calls.

After a de novo charter has been granted, the directors may call for the payment of the subscriptions in full within thirty days after the date of the notice that the charter has been granted. The bank shall not issue any shares until the bank has paid in full, in cash, the par value and the pro rata portion of the paid-in surplus specified in the de novo charter.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1088, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1480, § 43, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-111 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-402. First meetings of stockholders - director's oath - bylaws.

After the capital and surplus have been fully paid in cash and before any business is transacted, the incorporators shall call a meeting of the stockholders, on at least ten days' notice, to elect directors and to adopt bylaws, and shall direct the call, on at least five days' notice, of the first meeting of directors for election of officers.

Every director of a state bank shall take and subscribe to an oath before a disinterested notary public that the director will, insofar as the duty devolves upon him or her, diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the bank and that he or she will not knowingly violate nor willingly permit to be violated any provision of the law.

Bylaws may be adopted and amended by a majority vote at a stockholders' meeting, but the bylaws may provide for adoption or amendment by the board of directors of any provisions other than those relating to the duties, term of office, remuneration, reimbursement, or indemnification of a director. Copies of all bylaws and amendments thereto shall be filed with the commissioner.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1088, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-112 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-403. Stockholders' meetings - voting trusts - preemptive right - transfer of stock.

A regular annual meeting of stockholders shall be held each year as the bylaws direct. A special meeting may be called at any time by the banking board or the commissioner, by not less than one-third of the directors, or by the holders of twenty-five percent of the outstanding voting shares. The regular annual meeting and special meetings of the stockholders shall be held at such place as may be designated in the bylaws. Notice shall be mailed at least ten days before a meeting to every person who is a stockholder of record twenty days before the date of the meeting or at such longer period as may be provided in the bylaws. Such notice shall be mailed to the stockholder's address on the records of the bank. No business shall be transacted at a special meeting that is not specified in the notice thereof or necessary or proper in connection with or incidental to the business specified. The holders of a majority of the outstanding voting shares, or their authorized representatives, shall constitute a quorum. In the absence of a quorum, a meeting may be adjourned from time to time without notice to the stockholders.

Except on the election of directors, when cumulative voting is provided for in the charter, each share of common stock shall have one vote, which may be cast by the owner of record on the record date or by such owner's proxy, whether or not the owner of record has the beneficial interest therein. The bank may not vote shares that it holds in any capacity other than as fiduciary.

A stockholder authorized to vote may, by means of a proxy executed in writing, appoint a representative to cast his or her vote. The banking board may promulgate rules governing proxies and the solicitation thereof.

No shares deposited under a voting trust agreement shall be voted by the trustee unless the agreement has been approved by the banking board. Approval shall be withheld or, if previously granted, revoked if it appears that the existence of the trust would tend to reduce competition among lending institutions or to affect adversely the character or competence of the management or the bank's policies or operating procedures. In the absence of such approval, the record owner may vote his or her shares.

Unless otherwise provided in the charter, if additional stock of a class is offered for sale, stockholders of record of the same class on the date of the offer shall have the right to subscribe to such proportion of the shares as the stock held by them bears to the total of the outstanding stock. This right shall be transferable, but shall terminate if not exercised within thirty days after the offer. If the right is not exercised, the stock shall not be offered for sale to others at a lower price, or on other more favorable terms, without the stockholders again being accorded a preemptive right to subscribe.

No transfer of shares of stock shall be effective with respect to the bank until it has been entered upon the transfer books. The stock book shall be available for examination by a stockholder of the corporation at the principal place of business during its business hours.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1088, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-113 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-404. Waiver of notice - meeting or vote.

When a notice is required to be given to stockholders under this code, or the charter or bylaws of any state bank, a waiver thereof in writing, signed by the person entitled to said notice, either before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent thereto.

If the vote of stockholders at a meeting thereof is required or permitted to be taken in connection with any corporate action by any section of this code, the meeting and vote of stockholders may be dispensed with, if all of the stockholders who would have been entitled to vote upon the action if such meeting were held consent in writing to such corporate action being taken.

In the event that the action that is consented to is such as would have required the filing of a certificate under any of the other sections of this code if such action had been voted upon by the stockholders at a meeting thereof, the certificate filed under such other section shall state that written consent has been given under this section, in lieu of stating that the stockholders have voted upon the corporate action in question, if such last mentioned statement is required thereby.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1089, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-116 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-405. Amendment of articles - change of location - authorized but unissued stock.

A state bank may apply to the banking board to amend its articles of incorporation or to change its location.

An application for an amendment of the articles of incorporation to change the authorized capital and the number and par value of the shares, to acquire or abandon trust powers, or to change its location shall be authorized by the vote of two-thirds of the outstanding voting stock voted at a meeting of the stockholders. Any other application may be authorized by the vote of a majority of the outstanding voting stock voted at a meeting of the stockholders.

Notice of the application shall be sent to such persons and organizations as the banking board may require.

The banking board shall approve an application:

To change the name of the corporation if the proposed name is not deceptive or misleading;

To increase the total capital by increasing the amount of capital stock; but an amendment increasing the total capital shall not become effective until the banking board finds that the new capital has been fully paid in cash; except that amendments increasing the capital stock of the bank in the category of authorized but unissued stock shall be approved pursuant to the provisions of subsection (6) of this section.

In making its determination thereon, the banking board shall consider whether the public need and advantage would be served by granting the application and shall be guided by the standards prescribed for the approval of an application for a charter, insofar as they are reasonably applicable. In making its determination upon an application for change of location, the banking board shall consider the need and advantage of both the community or area of the community in which the bank will be located and the community or area of the community from which the bank will be moved.

A state bank, upon application to and approval by the banking board and by vote of two-thirds of the outstanding voting stock voted at a meeting of the stockholders, by an amendment of the articles of incorporation, may authorize an increase in the capital stock of the bank in the category of authorized but unissued stock. Such authorized but unissued stock may be issued from time to time to employees of the bank pursuant to stock option or stock purchase plans adopted in accordance with the provisions of section 11-103-101 (2)(h), or in exchange for convertible preferred stock or convertible capital debentures in accordance with the terms and provisions of such securities. Authorized but unissued stock may also be issued from time to time for such other purposes and considerations as may be approved by the board of directors of the state bank and the banking board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1089, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-117 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-103-406. Dividends - when payable.

The board of directors of a state bank may declare dividends from retained earnings and from other components of capital specifically approved by the banking board so long as the declaration is made in compliance with the rules established by the banking board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1090, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-3-118 as it existed prior to 2003.